Nebraska, session 109, LB241.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Cybersecurity event means an event resulting in unauthorized access
to, or disruption or misuse of, an information system or nonpublic information
stored on an information system;
(b) Information system means:
(i) A discrete set of electronic information resources organized for the
collection, processing, maintenance, use, sharing, dissemination, or
disposition of electronic nonpublic information; or
(ii) A specialized system, including an industrial or process control
system, a telephone switching and private branch exchange system, and an
environmental control system;
(c) Nonpublic information means information that is not publicly available
and concerns a person that, because of a name, number, personal mark, or other
identifier, can be used to identify such person, in combination with the
following:
(i) A social security number;
(ii) A driver's license number or state identification card number;
(iii) A financial account number or credit or debit card number;
(iv) A security code, access code, or password that would permit access to
such person's financial accounts; or
(v) Any biometric record;
(d) Private entity means a corporation, religious or charitable
organization, association, partnership, limited liability company, limited
liability partnership, or other private business entity, whether organized for-
profit or not-for-profit; and
(e) Publicly available information means information that is lawfully made
available through federal, state, or local government records or information
that a private entity has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made
available to the general public.
(2) A private entity shall not be liable in a class action resulting from
a cybersecurity event unless the cybersecurity event was caused by willful,
wanton, or gross negligence on the part of the private entity.
-1-